src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON FAKTÅVRRÅ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -åvrrå with long and short compound-form.

!Words ending on -or with tonefall 2, or with stress on last syll, go to this lexicon (like kontor>kontåvrrå). If the stress is on the first syll, and tonefall 1, it goes to GAHPER (like lektor>liektur) Some words go to both because of differences in swedish and norwegian (liektur/lektåvrrå). (This system is from Morén-Duolljá 2014)
!Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

  +Cmp/SgNom:åvrrå%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:or%>      R                    ;
            :åvrrå%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :åvrrå%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :åvrrå»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :åvrrå»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :åvrrå»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:åvrå%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:åvrå%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:or        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old faktora


!!€gt-norm: oajvvekontåvrrå # Even-syllable test
!!€ oajvvekontåvrrå:                 oajvvekontåvrrå+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ oajvvekontåvrås:                 oajvvekontåvrrå+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON KULTUVRRA
 +N+OLang/NOB: KULTUVRRA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON KULTUVRRA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -vrra with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
            :vrra%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :vrra%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :vrra»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :vrra»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :vrra»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:vrra%>   R                    ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:vra%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:vra%>j   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:r%>      R                    ; !short cmp, "kulturskåvllå"
   +Err/Orth:r        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old kultura


!!€gt-norm: muvrra # Even-syllable test
!!€ muvrra:                 muvrra+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ muvrajn:                 muvrra+N+Sg+Com

LEXICON INTERIERRA
 +N+OLang/NOB: INTERIERRA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON INTERIERRA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ør with long and short compound-form. Standarized by Giellagálldo 05.0514 as -erra. -ørra is subtaged
                    :erra%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
                    :erra%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
                    :erra»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                    :erra»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
                    :erra»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
          +Cmp/SgNom:erra%>   R                    ;
          +Cmp/SgGen:era%>    R                    ;
          +Cmp/PlGen:era%>j   R                    ;
         +CmpNP/Pref:ørs%>    R                    ;
           +Err/Orth:ør        A_CMP_INFL          ; ! makes old observatøra
           +Err/Orth:ørra%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ; ! makes old observatørra
           +Err/Orth:ørra%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! makes old observatørra
           +Err/Orth:ørra»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ; ! makes old observatørra
           +Err/Orth:ørra»    DenominalAdjsV1      ; ! makes old observatørra
           +Err/Orth:ørra»    DenominalAdjsV2      ; ! makes old observatørra
 +Err/Orth+Cmp/SgNom:ørra%>   R                    ; ! makes old observatørra
 +Err/Orth+Cmp/SgGen:øra%>    R                    ; ! makes old observatørra
 +Err/Orth+Cmp/PlGen:øra%>j   R                    ; ! makes old observatørra

!!€gt-norm: observaterra # Even-syllable test
!!€ observaterra:                 observaterra+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ observateras:                 observaterra+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON SUBSTÁNSSA
 +N+OLang/NOB: SUBSTÁNSSA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON SUBSTÁNSSA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ánssa with long and short compound-form. Originally -ans in SWE and NOR. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
  +Cmp/SgNom:ánssa%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:ans%>     R                    ;
            :ánssa%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ánssa%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ánssa»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ánssa»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ánssa»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:ánsa%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:ánsa%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:ansa      A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old substansa


!!€gt-norm: instánssa # Even-syllable test
!!€ instánssa:                 instánssa+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ instánsas:                 instánssa+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON VALÆNSSA
 +N+OLang/NOB: VALÆNSSA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON VALÆNSSA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ænssa with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
  +Cmp/SgNom:ænssa%>    R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:ens%>      R                    ;
            :ænssa%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ænssa%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ænssa»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ænssa»     DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ænssa»     DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:ænssa%>Q1  R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:ænssa%>Q1j R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:ens        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old valensa

!!€gt-norm: intelligænssa # Even-syllable test
!!€ intelligænssa:                 intelligænssa+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ intelligänssa:                 intelligænssa+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ intelligensav:                 intelligænssa+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON PARADIJSSA
 +N+OLang/NOB: PARADIJSSA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON PARADIJSSA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijssa with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
  +Cmp/SgNom:ijssa%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:s%>       R                    ;
            :ijssa%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ijssa%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ijssa»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ijssa»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ijssa»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:ijsa%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:ijsa%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:isa       A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old paradisa
  

!!€gt-norm: servijssa # Even-syllable test
!!€ servijssa:                 servijssa+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ servijsas:                 servijssa+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ADVOKÁHTTA
 +N+OLang/NOB: ADVOKÁHTTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ADVOKÁHTTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -áhtta with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
  +Cmp/SgNom:áhtta%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:at%>      R                    ;
            :áhtta%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :áhtta%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :áhtta»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :áhtta»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :áhtta»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:áhta%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:áhta%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:at        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old advokata


!!€gt-norm: klimáhtta # Even-syllable test
!!€ klimáhtta:                 klimáhtta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ klimáhtas:                 klimáhtta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ALFABIEHTTA
      +OLang/NOB:       ALFABIEHTTA_CMP_INFL ;
