src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
ambassaderra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ambassad INTERIERRA ; ! 
anijssa+Sem/Plant:an PARADIJSSA ;
armatuvrra+Sem/Obj:armatu KULTUVRRA ;
avijssa+Err/Orth+Sem/Org_Txt:áv PARADIJSSA ; ! 
avijssa+Sem/Org_Txt:av PARADIJSSA ; ! 
avánssa+Sem/Dummytag:av SUBSTÁNSSA ;
bajemusingenerra+Err/Orth+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bajemus#ingeni INTERIERRA ;
bajemusingenerra+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bajemus#insjin INTERIERRA ;
bankomáhtta+Area/SE+Sem/Obj-el:bankom ADVOKÁHTTA ; ! NOR minibank
biejvveavijssa+Sem/Txt:biejvve#av PARADIJSSA ;
biodiversitiehtta+Sem/State:bio#diversit ALFABIEHTTA ; ! 
civilingenerra+Err/Orth+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:civil#ingenj INTERIERRA ; !
cotangænssa+Sem/Cat:cotang VALÆNSSA ;
dependænssa+Sem/Rel:depend VALÆNSSA ; ! 
dialijssa+Sem/Act:dial PARADIJSSA ;
diktáhtta+Sem/Txt:dikt ADVOKÁHTTA ; ! 
direkterra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:direkt INTERIERRA ; ! 
dissonánssa+Sem/State:disson SUBSTÁNSSA ;
dosentuvrra+Sem/Pos:dosentu KULTUVRRA ; ! GG 
dánssa+Sem/Dance:d SUBSTÁNSSA ; ! 
efficiænssa+Area/SE+Sem/Feat:effici^ VALÆNSSA ;
eksistænssa+Sem/State:eksist VALÆNSSA ; ! GG 
etnisitiehtta+Sem/Feat:etnisit ALFABIEHTTA ; ! GG 
exterierra+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Buildpart:exteri^ INTERIERRA ;
frekvænssa+Sem/Feat-measr:frekv VALÆNSSA ; ! 
granáhtta+Sem/Mat:gran ADVOKÁHTTA ; ! 
guláskuddaminstánssa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:guláskuddam#in^st SUBSTÁNSSA ;
habitualitiehtta+Sem/Feat:habitu^alit ALFABIEHTTA ;
hypofijssa+Sem/Body:hypof PARADIJSSA ;
ingenerra+Err/Orth+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ingenj INTERIERRA ; ! 
ingenerra+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:insjin INTERIERRA ; ! 
intertekstualitiehtta+Sem/Domain:inter#tekstu^alit ALFABIEHTTA ; ! GG
kandidatuvrra+Sem/State:kandidatu KULTUVRRA ;
kandidáhtta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kandid ADVOKÁHTTA ; ! 
kommenderra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kommend INTERIERRA ;
kompetænssa+Sem/Dummytag:kompet VALÆNSSA ;
kompleksitiehtta+Sem/Dummytag:kom^pleksit ALFABIEHTTA ; ! GG
konsekvænssa+Sem/Semcon:konsekv VALÆNSSA ; ! 
konsonánssa+Sem/Dummytag:konson SUBSTÁNSSA ;
korrektuvrra+Sem/Domain:korrektu KULTUVRRA ;
krijssa+Sem/State:kr PARADIJSSA ;
kránssa+Sem/Clth-jewl_Obj:kr SUBSTÁNSSA ;
lakrijssa+Sem/Dummytag:lakr PARADIJSSA ;
legitimitiehtta+Sem/Feat:legitimit ALFABIEHTTA ; ! 
lektoráhtta+Sem/Dummytag:lektor ADVOKÁHTTA ;
ligatuvrra+Sem/Dummytag:ligatu KULTUVRRA ;
mikrostruktuvrra+Sem/Feat:mikro#struktu KULTUVRRA ; ! 
minoritiehtta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:minorit ALFABIEHTTA ; ! 
njuohpammagniehtta+Sem/Obj:njuohpam#magn ALFABIEHTTA ; ! GG
njuovadakstruktuvrra+Sem/Feat-phys:njuovadak#struktu KULTUVRRA ; ! 
nyánssa+Sem/Dummytag:ny SUBSTÁNSSA ;
pariapparáhtta+Sem/Obj-el:pari#appar ADVOKÁHTTA ;
polijssa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:pol PARADIJSSA ;
potænssa+Sem/Feat:pot VALÆNSSA ; ! 
prefektuvrra+Sem/Dummytag:prefektu KULTUVRRA ;
pulvarapparáhtta+Sem/Dummytag:pulvar#appar ADVOKÁHTTA ;
redakterra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:redakt INTERIERRA ;
referánssa+Area/SE+Sem/Dummytag:refer VALÆNSSA ;
resistánssa+Sem/State:resi^st SUBSTÁNSSA ;
románssa+Sem/Dummytag:rom SUBSTÁNSSA ;
ruvnnaalfabiehtta+Sem/Dummytag:ruvnna#alfab ALFABIEHTTA ;
sivilingenerra+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sivil#insjin INTERIERRA ;
sjánssa+Sem/Dummytag:sj SUBSTÁNSSA ;
skepsijssa+Sem/Dummytag:skeps PARADIJSSA ;
skulptuvrra+Sem/Obj:skulptu KULTUVRRA ;
soldáhtta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sold ADVOKÁHTTA ;
stáhtaadvokáhtta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:stáhta#advok ADVOKÁHTTA ;
tangænssa+Sem/Dummytag:tang VALÆNSSA ;
tastatuvrra+Sem/Obj-el:tastatu KULTUVRRA ;
toleránssa+Sem/Dummytag:toler SUBSTÁNSSA ;
tomáhtta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Dummytag:tom ADVOKÁHTTA ;
trompiehtta+Area/SE+Sem/Tool-music:trump ALFABIEHTTA ; ! 
turkijssa+Area/NO+Sem/Dummytag:turk PARADIJSSA ;
tuvrra+Sem/Act:tu KULTUVRRA ;
vuostasjamanuænssa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuostasj#amanu^ VALÆNSSA ;
æládusstruktuvrra+Sem/Feat:æládus#struktu KULTUVRRA ;
